California statutes. Penal Code
(1) When a prisoner is confined in or committed to a county jail, industrial farm, or road camp or a city jail, industrial farm, or road camp, including all days of custody from the date of arrest to the date when the sentence commences, under a judgment of imprisonment or of a fine and imprisonment until the fine is paid in a criminal action or proceeding.

(2) When a prisoner is confined in or committed to a county jail, industrial farm, or road camp or a city jail, industrial farm, or road camp as a condition of probation after suspension of imposition of a
 sentence or suspension of execution of sentence in a criminal action or proceeding.

(3) When a prisoner is confined in or committed to a county jail, industrial farm, or road camp or a city jail, industrial farm, or road camp for a definite period of time for contempt pursuant to a proceeding other than a criminal action or proceeding.

(4) When a prisoner is confined in a county jail, industrial farm, or road camp or a city jail, industrial farm, or road camp following arrest and prior to the imposition of sentence for a felony conviction.

(5) When a prisoner is confined in a county jail, industrial farm, or road camp or a city jail, industrial farm, or road camp as part of custodial sanction imposed following a violation of
 postrelease community supervision or parole.

(6) When a prisoner is confined in a county jail, industrial farm, or road camp or a city jail, industrial farm, or road camp as a result of a sentence imposed pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(7) When a prisoner participates in a program pursuant to Section 1203.016 or Section 4024.2. Except for prisoners who have already been deemed eligible to receive credits for participation in a program pursuant to Section 1203.016 prior to January 1, 2015, this paragraph shall apply prospectively.

(8) When a prisoner is confined in or committed to a state hospital or other mental health treatment facility, or to a county jail treatment facility in proceedings pursuant to
 Chapter 6
 (commencing with Section 1367) of Title 10 of Part 2.

(9) When a prisoner participates in a treatment program pursuant to Section 1203.44.

(b) Subject to subdivision (d), for each four-day period in which a prisoner is confined in or committed to a facility as specified in this section, one day shall be deducted from the prisoner’s period of confinement unless it appears by the record that the prisoner has refused to satisfactorily perform labor as assigned by the sheriff, chief of police, or superintendent of an industrial farm or road camp.

(c) For each four-day period in which a prisoner is confined in or committed to a facility as specified in this section, one day shall be deducted from the
 prisoner’s period of confinement unless it appears by the record that the prisoner has not satisfactorily complied with the reasonable rules and regulations established by the sheriff, chief of police, or superintendent of an industrial farm or road camp.

(d) This section does not require the sheriff, chief of police, or superintendent of an industrial farm or road camp to assign labor to a prisoner if it appears from the record that the prisoner has refused to satisfactorily perform labor as assigned or that the prisoner has not satisfactorily complied with the reasonable rules and regulations of the sheriff, chief of police, or superintendent of an industrial farm or road camp.

(e) A deduction shall not be made under this section unless the person is committed for a period of
 four days or longer.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that if all days are earned under this section, a term of four days will be deemed to have been served for every two days spent in actual custody.

(g) The changes in this section as enacted by the act that added this subdivision shall apply to prisoners who are confined to a county jail, city jail, industrial farm, or road camp for a crime committed on or after the effective date of that act.

(h) The changes to this section enacted by the act that added this subdivision shall apply prospectively and shall apply to prisoners who are confined to a county jail, city jail, industrial farm, or road camp for a crime committed on or after October 1, 2011. Any days
 earned by a prisoner prior to October 1, 2011, shall be calculated at the rate required by the prior law.

(i) (1) This section shall not apply, and no credits may be earned, for periods of flash incarceration imposed pursuant to Section 3000.08 or 3454.

(2) Credits earned pursuant to this section for a period of flash incarceration pursuant to Section 1203.35 shall, if the person’s probation or mandatory supervision is revoked, count towards the term to be served.

(j) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2028, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 756, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 685, Sec. 3.   (AB 1360)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 4 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 685.)
-------------------------------------------

4019.

(a) This section applies in all of the following cases:

(1) When a prisoner is confined in or committed to a county jail, industrial farm, or road camp or a city jail, industrial farm, or road camp, including all days of custody from the date of arrest to the date when the sentence commences, under a judgment of imprisonment or of a fine and imprisonment until the fine is paid in a criminal action or proceeding.

(2) When a prisoner is confined in or committed to a county jail, industrial farm, or road camp or a city jail, industrial farm, or road camp as a condition of probation after suspension of imposition of a sentence or
 suspension of execution of sentence in a criminal action or proceeding.

(3) When a prisoner is confined in or committed to a county jail, industrial farm, or road camp or a city jail, industrial farm, or road camp for a definite period of time for contempt pursuant to a proceeding other than a criminal action or proceeding.

(4) When a prisoner is confined in a county jail, industrial farm, or road camp or a city jail, industrial farm, or road camp following arrest and prior to the imposition of sentence for a felony conviction.

(5) When a prisoner is confined in a county jail, industrial farm, or road camp or a city jail, industrial farm, or road camp as part of custodial sanction imposed following a violation of postrelease
 community supervision or parole.

(6) When a prisoner is confined in a county jail, industrial farm, or road camp or a city jail, industrial farm, or road camp as a result of a sentence imposed pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(7) When a prisoner participates in a program pursuant to Section 1203.016 or Section 4024.2. Except for prisoners who have already been deemed eligible to receive credits for participation in a program pursuant to Section 1203.016 prior to January 1, 2015, this paragraph shall apply prospectively.

(8) When a prisoner is confined in or committed to a state hospital or other mental health treatment facility, or to a county jail treatment facility.

(9) When a prisoner participates in a treatment program pursuant to Section 1203.44.

(b) Subject to subdivision (d), for each four-day period in which a prisoner is confined in or committed to a facility as specified in this section, one day shall be deducted from the prisoner’s period of confinement unless it appears by the record that the prisoner has refused to satisfactorily perform labor as assigned by the sheriff, chief of police, or superintendent of an industrial farm or road camp.

(c) For each four-day period in which a prisoner is confined in or committed to a facility as specified in this section, one day shall be deducted from the prisoner’s period of confinement unless it appears by the record that the prisoner has not satisfactorily complied with
 the reasonable rules and regulations established by the sheriff, chief of police, or superintendent of an industrial farm or road camp.

(d) This section does not require the sheriff, chief of police, or superintendent of an industrial farm or road camp to assign labor to a prisoner if it appears from the record that the prisoner has refused to satisfactorily perform labor as assigned or that the prisoner has not satisfactorily complied with the reasonable rules and regulations of the sheriff, chief of police, or superintendent of an industrial farm or road camp.

(e) A deduction shall not be made under this section unless the person is committed for a period of four days or longer.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that
 if all days are earned under this section, a term of four days will be deemed to have been served for every two days spent in actual custody.

(g) The changes in this section as enacted by the act that added this subdivision shall apply to prisoners who are confined to a county jail, city jail, industrial farm, or road camp for a crime committed on or after the effective date of that act.

(h) The changes to this section enacted by the act that added this subdivision shall apply prospectively and shall apply to prisoners who are confined to a county jail, city jail, industrial farm, or road camp for a crime committed on or after October 1, 2011. Any days earned by a prisoner prior to October 1, 2011, shall be calculated at the rate required by the prior law.

(i) This section shall not apply, and no credits may be earned, for periods of flash incarceration imposed pursuant to Section 3000.08 or 3454.

(j) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 756, Sec. 4) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 685, Sec. 4.   (AB 1360)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Section operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4019.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the sheriff or county director of corrections may, at his or her discretion, award additional time credits to any inmate sentenced to the county jail who participates in an in-custody work or job training program other than those specified in Section 4019.2, and who is eligible to receive one day of credit for every one day of incarceration pursuant to Section 4019. The sheriff or county director of corrections may instead award one and one-half days of credit for every one day of incarceration while satisfactorily participating in work or job training subject to this section.

(b) As used in this section, a work or job training program includes, but is not limited to,
 any inmate working on an industrial farm or industrial road camp as authorized in Section 4101, an environmental improvement and preservation program, or projects such as forest and brush fire prevention, forest, brush, and watershed management, fish and game management, soil conservation, and forest and watershed revegetation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 32, Sec. 12.   (SB 76)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4019.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, any inmate sentenced to county jail assigned to a conservation camp by a sheriff and who is eligible to earn one day of credit for every one day of incarceration pursuant to Section 4019 shall instead earn two days of credit for every one day of service.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, any inmate who has completed training for assignment to a conservation camp or to a state or county facility as an inmate firefighter or who is assigned to a county or state correctional institution as an inmate firefighter and who is eligible to earn one day of credit for every one day of incarceration pursuant to Section 4019 shall instead earn two days of
 credit for every one day served in that assignment or after completing that training.

(c) (1) In addition to the credits received pursuant to subdivision (b), incarcerated individual hand crew members shall be paid an hourly wage equal to seven dollars and twenty-five cents ($7.25) while assigned to an active fire incident. The wage rate shall be reviewed annually.

(2) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall
 maintain regulations regarding an administrative adjudication and remedy process for any dispute over sums owed pursuant to this section for incarcerated individual hand crew members assigned to a state conservation camp, facility, or institution.

(3) A county shall maintain regulations regarding an administrative adjudication and remedy process for any disputes over sums owed pursuant to this section for incarcerated individual hand crew members assigned to that county’s conservation camp, facility, or institution.

(d) In addition to credits granted pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), inmates who have successfully completed training for firefighter assignments shall receive a credit reduction from their term of
 confinement.

(e) The credits authorized in subdivisions (b) and (d) shall only apply to inmates who are eligible after October 1, 2011.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 681, Sec. 2.   (AB 247)   Effective October 13, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4019.3.

The board of supervisors may credit each prisoner with a sum of money to be determined by the board if the prisoner is confined in or committed to a county jail and performs a work assignment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 252, Sec. 1.   (AB 248)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4019.4.

(a) (1) In addition to credit awarded pursuant to Section 4019, a sheriff or county director of corrections may also award an inmate program credit reductions from his or her term of confinement as provided in this section. A sheriff or county director of corrections who elects to participate in this credit reduction program shall create guidelines that provide for credit reductions for inmates who successfully complete specific program performance objectives for approved rehabilitative programming, including, but not limited to, credit reduction of not less than one week to credit reduction of not more than six weeks for each performance milestone.

(2) Guidelines
 adopted by a sheriff or county director of corrections pursuant to this subdivision shall specify the credit reductions applicable to distinct objectives in a schedule of graduated program performance objectives concluding with the successful completion of an in-custody rehabilitation program. Upon adopting the guidelines, the sheriff or county director of corrections shall thereafter calculate and award credit reductions authorized by this section. An inmate may not have his or her term of imprisonment reduced by more than six weeks for credits awarded pursuant to this section during any 12-month period of continuous confinement.

(b) Program credit is a privilege, not a right. An inmate shall have a reasonable opportunity to participate in program credit qualifying assignments in a manner consistent with institutional security,
 available resources, and guidelines set forth by the sheriff or county director of corrections.

(c) As used in this section, “approved rehabilitation programming” includes, but is not limited to, academic programs, vocational programs, vocational training, substance abuse programs, and core programs such as anger management and social life skills.

(d) Credits awarded pursuant to this section may be forfeited pursuant to the provisions of Section 4019. An inmate shall not be eligible for program credits that result in him or her being overdue for release.

(e) This section applies to sentenced and unsentenced inmates confined in a county jail.

(f) (1) Nothing in this section shall prevent a person who has not been sentenced from participating in an approved rehabilitation program pursuant to this section.

(2) If a person is awarded credits prior to sentencing, the credits shall be applied to a sentence for the offense for which the person was awaiting sentence when the credits were awarded in the same manner as all other credits awarded.

(g) Evidence that an inmate
 has participated in, or attempted to participate in, an approved rehabilitation program eligible for credit pursuant to this section is not admissible in any proceeding as an admission of guilt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 36, Sec. 1.   (AB 1597)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4019.5.

(a) “Kangaroo court” as used in this section means a mock court conducted by any prisoner or group of prisoners for the purpose of inflicting punishment upon any fellow prisoner in any prison, jail, jail camp, or other place of detention.

(b) “Sanitary committee” means a committee of prisoners formed ostensibly for the purpose of enforcing institutional sanitation but actually used for the purpose of inflicting punishment on any fellow prisoner, or group of prisoners in any prison, jail, jail camp, or other place of detention.

(c) It is unlawful for any sheriff, deputy sheriff, police officer, warden or keeper of a jail to delegate to any prisoner or group of prisoners, authority to exercise the right of punishment over any other prisoner or group of prisoners in any county or city prison, jail, jail camp, or other place of detention at which any person charged with or convicted of crime is detained.

(d) It is unlawful for any sheriff, deputy sheriff, police officer, warden or keeper of a jail to knowingly permit any prisoner or group of prisoners to assume authority over any other prisoner or group of prisoners by the operation of “kangaroo courts” or “sanitary committees.”

(e) Every public official in charge of a prison, jail or other place of detention shall keep a record of all disciplinary infractions and punishment administered therefor.

(f) This section shall not prevent the use of skilled inmates, under adequate and proper supervision and guidance of jailers or other employed personnel, as instructors of other inmates in the performance of assigned work, if that relationship does not include the exercise of disciplinary authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 124.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4020.

Whenever the board of health of any city or county, or the board of supervisors of any county, or the county physician of any county of this State, presents, or causes to be presented to the sheriff, or other officer having charge of any county jail or prison in any county or city, in this State, a certificate, or order, in writing, to the effect that it is by them, or him, considered necessary for the purpose of protecting the public health, or to prevent the introduction or spreading of disease, or to protect or improve the health of criminals under sentence, that the hair of any criminal or criminals be cut, such sheriff, or other officer, must cut, or cause to be cut, the hair of any such person or persons in his charge convicted of a misdemeanor and sentenced to a longer term of imprisonment than 15 days, to a uniform length of one and one-half inches from the scalp of such person or persons so imprisoned.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

4020.4.

In every county having a population of more than 275,000, there shall be a female deputy sheriff in charge of female prisoners.

The sheriff of the county shall appoint the female deputy sheriff in charge of female prisoners.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 643.)
-------------------------------------------

4020.7.

The duties and powers of the female deputy sheriff or other suitable woman assigned to jail duty shall be as follows:

(a) She shall have free access at all reasonable times to the immediate presence of all female prisoners in the county jail to which she is assigned, including the right of personal visitation and conversation with them, and in all cases of searching the persons of female prisoners in such jail, the female deputy sheriff shall make such search;

(b) The female deputy sheriff or other suitable woman shall by example, advice, and admonition employ her best abilities to secure and promote the health, welfare, and reformation of all such prisoners.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 643.)
-------------------------------------------

4020.8.

No officer, deputy, jailer, keeper, guard, or person having charge or control of any such county jail shall refuse the duly appointed and qualified female deputy sheriff thereof, or other suitable woman having the care of female prisoners, free access at all reasonable times to the immediate presence of all female prisoners therein, including the right of visitation and conversation with them, or in such jail allow the searching of the person of a female prisoner to be made except by the female deputy sheriff of such jail or other suitable woman, or obstruct the performance by the female deputy sheriff, or other suitable woman, of her official duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 643.)
-------------------------------------------

4021.

(a) Whenever any female prisoner or prisoners are confined in any local detention facility in the state there shall be an appropriately trained female custodial person assigned, available, and accessible for the supervision of the female prisoners.

(b) It shall be unlawful for any officer, station officer, jailer, or custodial personnel to search the person of any prisoner of the opposite sex, or to enter into the room or cell occupied by any prisoner of the opposite sex, except in the company of an employee of the same sex as the prisoner. Except as provided herein, the provisions of this subdivision shall not be applied to discriminate against any employee by prohibiting appointment or work assignment on the basis of the sex of the employee.

As used in this subdivision “station officer” means an unarmed civilian employee who assists a peace officer in the processing of persons who have been arrested and who performs duties including, but not limited to, booking and fingerprinting and maintaining custody and control of persons who have been arrested.

As used in this subdivision, “employee” means a deputy sheriff, correctional officer, custodial officer, medical staff person or designated civilian employee whose duties may include, but are not limited to, maintaining custody and control of persons who have been arrested or sentenced, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 986, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4022.

Whenever by the terms of this code, or of any other law of the state, it is provided that a prisoner shall be confined in any county jail, such provision shall be construed to authorize any prisoner convicted of a misdemeanor to be confined, with the consent of the city, in any city jail in the judicial district in which the offense was committed, and as to such prisoner so confined in such city jail, the designations, county jail and city jail shall be interchangeable, and in such case the obligations to which the county is liable in case of confinement in a county jail, shall become liabilities of the city where such prisoner is confined in a city jail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 434.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4023.

Whenever the daily average of more than 100 persons are confined in any county or city jail there shall be available at all times a duly licensed and practicing physician for the care and treatment of all persons confined therein. Such daily average shall be determined by the number of persons confined in such jails during the last fiscal year. For county jails, such physician shall be designated by the sheriff. The salary of such physician shall be fixed by the supervisors of the county and shall be paid out of the same fund of the county as other claims against the county for salaries are paid. For city jails, such physician shall be designated and his salary fixed by the council of the city and shall be paid out of the general fund of such city. Any prisoner may decline such care or treatment and provide other care or treatment for himself at his own expense.

In the event a prisoner elects to decline treatment by the county or city jail physician and to provide medical treatment at his own expense, the sheriff or chief of police may have him removed from the county or city jail to a privately owned and operated medical facility or hospital located in the county approved by a judge of the superior court for such treatment. The prisoner shall be liable for the costs incurred by the county or city in providing the necessary custody and security of the prisoner only to the extent that such costs exceed the costs which would have been incurred by the county or city in providing such custody and security if it had provided treatment for him. The prisoner shall at all times remain in the location specified by the court and at no time be permitted to be housed or detained at any facility other than that designated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 683.)
-------------------------------------------

4023.5.

(a) A person confined in a local detention facility shall be allowed to continue to use materials necessary for personal hygiene with regard to their menstrual cycle and reproductive system, including, but not limited to, sanitary pads and tampons, at no cost to the incarcerated person. A person confined in a local detention facility shall, upon request, be allowed to continue to use materials necessary for birth control measures as prescribed by a physician, nurse practitioner, certified nurse-midwife, or physician assistant.

(b) A person confined in a local detention facility shall be furnished by the county with information and education regarding the availability of family planning services.

(c) Family planning services shall be offered to a person confined in a local detention facility at least 60 days prior to a scheduled release date. Upon request, a person shall be furnished by the county with the services of a licensed physician or they shall be furnished by the county or by any other agency that contracts with the county with services necessary to meet their family planning needs at the time of the person’s release.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “local detention facility” means a city, county, or regional facility used for the
 confinement of any prisoner for more than 24 hours.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 939, Sec. 2.   (AB 1810)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4023.6.

(a) Any incarcerated person in any local detention facility shall have the right to summon and receive the services of any physician, nurse practitioner, certified nurse midwife, or physician assistant of their choice in order to determine whether they are pregnant. The superintendent of the facility may adopt reasonable rules and regulations with regard to the conduct of examinations to effectuate the determination.

(b) If the incarcerated person is found to be pregnant, they are entitled to a determination of the extent of the medical and surgical services needed and to the receipt of such services from the physician, nurse practitioner,
 certified nurse midwife, or physician assistant of their choice. Any expenses occasioned by the services of a physician, nurse practitioner, certified nurse midwife, or physician assistant whose services are not provided by the facility shall be borne by the incarcerated person.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “local detention facility” means any city, county, or regional facility used for the confinement of any female prisoner for more than 24 hours.

(d) (1) Any physician providing services pursuant to this section shall possess a current, valid, and unrevoked certificate to engage in the practice of medicine issued pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(2) A nurse practitioner providing services pursuant to this section shall possess a current, valid, and unrevoked certificate issued pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 2834) of Chapter 6 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(3) A certified nurse midwife providing services pursuant to this section shall possess a current, valid, and unrevoked certificate issued pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 2746) of Chapter 6 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(4) A physician assistant providing services pursuant to this section shall possess a current, valid, and unrevoked certificate issued pursuant to Chapter 7.7 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 2 of the Business and
 Professions Code.

(e) The rights provided by this section shall be posted in at least one conspicuous place to which all incarcerated persons capable of becoming pregnant have access.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 321, Sec. 6.   (AB 732)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4023.8.

(a) A person incarcerated in a county jail who is identified as possibly pregnant or capable of becoming pregnant during an intake health examination or at any time during incarceration shall be offered a pregnancy test upon intake or by request, within seventy-two hours of arrival at the jail. Pregnancy tests shall be voluntary and not mandatory, and may only be administered by medical or nursing personnel. An incarcerated person who declines a pregnancy test shall be asked to sign an “Informed Refusal of Pregnancy Test” form that shall become part of their medical file.

(b) An incarcerated person with a positive pregnancy test result shall be offered
 comprehensive and unbiased options counseling that includes information about prenatal health care, adoption, and abortion. This counseling shall be furnished by a licensed health care provider or counselor who has been provided with training in reproductive health care and shall be nondirective, unbiased, and noncoercive. Jail staff shall not urge, force, or otherwise influence a pregnant person’s decision.

(c) A jail shall not confer authority or discretion to nonmedical jail staff to decide if a pregnant person is eligible for an abortion. If a pregnant person decides to have an abortion, that person shall be offered, but not forced to accept, all due medical care and accommodations until they are no longer pregnant. A pregnant person who decides to have an abortion shall be referred to a licensed professional specified in subdivision (b)
 of Section 2253 of Business and Professions Code.

(d) A person incarcerated in a county jail who is confirmed to be pregnant shall, within seven days of arriving at the jail, be scheduled for a pregnancy examination with a physician, nurse practitioner, certified nurse midwife, or physician assistant. The examination shall include all of the following:

(1) A determination of the gestational age of the pregnancy and the estimated due date.

(2) A plan of care, including referrals for specialty and other services to evaluate for the presence of chronic medical conditions or infectious diseases, and to use health and social status of the incarcerated person to improve quality of care, isolation practices, level of
 activities, and bed assignments, and to inform appropriate specialists in relationship to gestational age and social and clinical needs, and to guide use of personal protective equipment and additional counseling for prevention and control of infectious diseases, if needed.

(3) The ordering of prenatal labs and diagnostic studies, as needed based on gestational age or existing or newly diagnosed health conditions.

(e) Incarcerated pregnant persons shall be scheduled for prenatal care visits in accordance with medical standards outlined in the most current edition of Guidelines for Perinatal Care developed by the
 American Academy of Pediatrics (AAP) and the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists (ACOG) Committee on Obstetric Practice, unless more frequent visits are indicated by the physician, nurse practitioner, certified nurse midwife, or physician assistant.

(f) Incarcerated pregnant persons shall be provided access to both of the following:

(1) Prenatal vitamins, to be taken on a daily basis, in accordance with medical standards of care.

(2) Newborn care that includes access to appropriate assessment, diagnosis, care, and treatment for infectious diseases that may be transmitted from a birthing person to the birthing person’s infant, such as HIV or syphilis.

(g) Incarcerated pregnant persons housed in a multitier housing unit shall be assigned lower bunk and lower tier housing.

(h) Incarcerated pregnant persons shall not be tased, pepper sprayed, or
 exposed to other chemical weapons.

(i) Incarcerated pregnant persons who have used
 opioids prior to incarceration, either by admission or written documentation by a probation officer, or who are currently receiving methadone treatment, shall be offered medication assisted treatment with methadone or buprenorphine, pursuant to Section 11222 of the Health and Safety Code, and shall be provided information on the risks of withdrawal.

(j) An eligible incarcerated pregnant person or person who gives
 birth after incarceration in the jail shall be provided notice of, access to, and written application for, community-based programs serving pregnant, birthing, or lactating incarcerated persons.

(k) Each incarcerated pregnant person shall be referred to a social worker who shall do all of the following:

(1) Discuss with the incarcerated person the options available for feeding, placement, and care of the child after birth, including the benefits of lactation.

(2) Assist the incarcerated pregnant person with access to a phone in order to contact relatives regarding newborn placement.

(3) Oversee the placement of the newborn child.

(l) An incarcerated pregnant person shall be temporarily taken to a hospital outside the jail for the purpose of giving childbirth and shall be transported in the least restrictive way possible and in accordance with Section 3407. An incarcerated pregnant person shall not be shackled to anyone else during transport. An incarcerated pregnant person in labor or presumed to be in labor shall be treated as an emergency and shall be transported to the outside facility, accompanied by jail staff.

(m) An incarcerated pregnant person may elect to have a support person present during labor, childbirth, and during postpartum recovery while hospitalized. The support person may be an approved visitor or the jail’s staff designated to assist with prenatal care, labor, childbirth,
 lactation, and postpartum care.

(n) All pregnant and postpartum incarcerated persons shall receive appropriate, timely, culturally responsive, and medically accurate and comprehensive care, evaluation, and treatment of existing or newly diagnosed chronic conditions, including mental health disorders and infectious diseases.

(o) An incarcerated pregnant person in labor and delivery shall be given the maximum level of privacy possible during the labor and delivery process. If a guard is present, they shall be stationed outside the room rather than in the room absent extraordinary circumstances. If a guard must be present in the room, the guard shall stand in a place that grants as much privacy as possible during labor and delivery. A guard shall be removed from the room if a professional
 who is currently responsible for the medical care of a pregnant incarcerated person during a medical emergency, labor, delivery, or recovery after delivery determines that the removal of the guard is medically necessary.

(p) Upon return to jail, the physician, nurse practitioner, certified nurse midwife, or physician assistant shall provide a postpartum examination within one week from childbirth and as needed for up to 12 weeks postpartum, and shall determine whether the incarcerated person may be cleared for full duty or if medical restrictions are warranted. Postpartum individuals shall be given at least 12 weeks of recovery after any childbirth before they are required to resume normal activity.

(q) The rights provided for incarcerated persons by this section shall be posted in at least one conspicuous place to which all incarcerated persons have access.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 321, Sec. 7.   (AB 732)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4024.

(a) The sheriff may discharge any prisoner from the county jail at such time on the last day such prisoner may be confined as the sheriff shall consider to be in the best interests of the prisoner.

(b) (1) Upon completion of a sentence served by a prisoner or the release of a prisoner ordered by the court to be effected the same day, including prisoners who are released on their own recognizance, have their charges dismissed by the court, are acquitted by a jury, are cited and released on a misdemeanor charge, have posted bail, or have the charges against them dropped by the prosecutor, the sheriff may offer a voluntary program
 to the prisoner that would allow that prisoner to stay in the custody facility for up to 16 additional hours or until normal business hours, whichever is shorter, in order to offer the prisoner the ability to be discharged to a treatment center or during daytime hours. The prisoner may revoke his or her consent and be discharged as soon as possible and practicable.

(2) This subdivision does not prevent the early release of prisoners as otherwise allowed by law or allow jails to retain prisoners any longer than otherwise required by law without the prisoner’s express
 written consent.

(3) Offering this voluntary program is an act of discretion within the meaning of Section 820.2 of the Government Code.

(4) If a prisoner has posted bail and elects to participate in this program, he or she shall notify the bail agent as soon as possible and practicable of his or her decision to participate.

(5) A sheriff offering this program shall, whenever possible, allow the prisoner volunteering to participate in the program to make a telephone call to either arrange for transportation, or to notify
 the bail agent pursuant to paragraph (4), or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 90, Sec. 2.   (SB 833)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4024.1.

(a) The sheriff, chief of police, or any other person responsible for a county or city jail may apply to the presiding judge of the superior court to receive general authorization for a period of 30 days to release inmates pursuant to the provisions of this section.

(b) Whenever, after being authorized by a court pursuant to subdivision (a), the actual inmate count exceeds the actual bed capacity of a county or city jail, the sheriff, chief of police, or other person responsible for such county or city jail may accelerate the release, discharge, or expiration of sentence date of sentenced inmates up to a maximum of 30 days.

(c) The total number of inmates released pursuant to this section shall not exceed a number necessary to balance the inmate count and actual bed capacity.

(d) Inmates closest to their normal release, discharge, or expiration of sentence date shall be given accelerated release priority.
